District of Columbia statutes.
46-307.01

Proceeding to determine parentage.

A court of the District authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage brought under this chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 701, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(g), 53 DCR 3634

Cross References

Interstate family support, available proceeding, determination of parentage, see § 46-303.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-347.1.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 701 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).